District of Columbia statutes.
34-1209

Mandatory provisions of request for proposal. [Repealed.]

Repealed.

History

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 10, 29 DCR 2872
Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 2(p), 30 DCR 4289
Nov. 15, 1983, D.C. Law 5-42, § 4(b), 30 DCR 4999
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-210, § 3(c), 43 DCR 4702
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1809.

Editor's Notes

Recommended revision of draft of request for proposals and cable franchise application: Pursuant to Resolution 5-388, the “Cable Television Franchise Request for Proposals, Applications, and Procedures Recommendations Resolution of 1983,” effective October 18, 1983, the Council recommended that the District of Columbia Cable Design Commission revise the draft request for proposals and cable franchise application submitted to the Chairman of the Council, July 1, 1983.

Revised request for proposals approved: Pursuant to Resolution 5-422, the “Cable Television Franchise Revised Request for Proposals Approval Resolution of 1983,” effective November 15, 1983, the Council approved the request for proposals as revised pursuant to the Cable Television Franchise Request for Proposals Applications, and Procedures Recommendations Resolution of 1983.

Standard format proposed franchise agreement approved: Pursuant to Resolution 5-549, the “Cable Television Franchise Agreement Format Approval Resolution of 1984,” effective February 14, 1984, the Council approved the use by the District of Columbia Cable Design Commission of a standard format proposed franchise agreement.